Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2355
Public power and irrigation district funds; depositories; bond or security required.

No deposits in excess of the amount insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation shall be made or be allowed to accumulate in any bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution designated as a depository unless and until the treasurer or other competent officer of the district has received from such depository as security for the prompt repayment of such deposits by the depository either a surety bond in form and with corporate sureties approved by formal resolution of the board of directors of such district or, in lieu thereof, the giving of security as provided in the Public Funds Deposit Security Act. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1941, c. 160, § 2, p. 642;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-2538;

R.S.1943, § 77-2355;

Laws 1959, c. 263, § 21, p. 949;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 69;

Laws 1989, LB 377, § 17;

Laws 1992, LB 757, § 31;

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 44;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 65;

Laws 2009, LB259, § 21.

Public Funds Deposit Security Act, see section 77-2386.